Massachusetts, session 194th, H1071.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 11 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “paraplegic”, in lines 42 and 43, in each instance,
the following words:- or person who uses a wheelchair as their primary source of mobility.
of 1